Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 2 Composition of House of Representatives
The twentieth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Warwick bounded by a line beginning at Centerville Rd and I-95; thence westerly on Centerville Rd to Bald Hill Rd; thence northerly on Bald Hill Rd to Tollgate Rd; thence westerly on Tollgate Rd to the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line; thence northerly on the Warwick — West Warwick Boundary line to the Washington Secondary Trail; thence northerly on Washington Secondary Trail to East Ave; thence northwesterly on East Ave to the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line; thence northerly on the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line to the Cranston — Warwick boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Cranston — Warwick boundary line to Cranberry Bog Brook; thence southerly on Cranberry Bog Brook to Pawtuxet Ave; thence easterly on Pawtuxet Ave to George St; thence southerly on George St to Post Rd; thence southwesterly on Post Rd to Strawberry Field Rd; thence southeasterly on Strawberry Field Rd to the western boundary line of Rhode Island TF Green International Airport; thence southerly on the western boundary line of Rhode Island TF Green International Airport to Main Ave; thence westerly on Main Ave to the Amtrak RR; thence southerly on the Amtrak RR to Apponaug Cove; thence southeasterly on Apponaug Cove to the line extending from Masthead Dr; thence westerly on Masthead Dr to Post Rd; thence northerly on Post Rd to Greenwich Ave; thence northwesterly on Greenwich Ave to census block 440030221003016; thence southeasterly on the northern boundary line of census block 440030221003024 to I-95; thence southerly on I-95 to the point of origin.

The twentieth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Cranston bounded by a line beginning at the Cranston — Warwick boundary line and Pontiac Ave; thence northerly and northeasterly on Pontiac Ave to census block 440070142002029; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070142002028 — 440070142002029, 440070142002019 — 440070142002021 and 440070142002008 — 440070142002009 to State Highway 37; thence easterly on State Highway 37 to the Cranston — Warwick boundary line; thence southwesterly on the Cranston — Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

Twenty-first district:
The twenty-first representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Warwick bounded by a line beginning at Post Rd and Atlantic Ave; thence easterly on Atlantic Ave to Warwick Ave; thence southerly on Warwick Ave to Spring Green Pond; thence easterly on the unnamed river from Spring Green Pond to Narragansett Bay and the Warwick — East Providence boundary line; thence southerly on the Warwick — East Providence boundary line to the Warwick — Barrington boundary line; thence southerly on the Warwick — Barrington boundary line to the point extending from Symonds Ave; thence westerly on the line extending from Symonds Ave to Symonds Ave; thence southwesterly on Symonds Ave to Bush Ave; thence northwesterly on Bush Ave to West Shore Rd; thence northerly on West Shore Rd to Winter Ave; thence southwesterly on Winter Ave to Green River Ave; thence southeasterly on Green River Ave to Obidiah Ave; thence southwesterly on Obidiah Ave to Church Ave; thence northwesterly on Church Ave to Warwick Ave; thence southerly on Warwick Ave to Sevilla Ave; thence southwesterly on Sevilla Ave to Julian Rd; thence southerly on Julian Rd to Rodney Rd; thence southwesterly on Rodney Rd to census block 440030214011006; thence southwesterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440030214011006 — 440030214011012 to Buckeye Brook; thence westerly on Buckeye Brook to the eastern boundary line of Rhode Island TF Green International Airport; thence southwesterly and northwesterly on the eastern boundary line of Rhode Island TF Green International Airport to Warwick Industrial Dr; thence southerly on Warwick Industrial Dr to Main Ave; thence westerly on Main Ave to the western boundary line of Rhode Island TF Green International Airport; thence northerly on the western boundary line of Rhode Island TF Green International Airport to Strawberry Field Rd; thence northwesterly on Strawberry Field Rd to Post Rd; thence northeasterly on Post Rd to the point of origin.

Twenty-second district:
The twenty-second representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Warwick bounded by a line beginning at Church Ave and Warwick Ave; thence southeasterly on Warwick Ave to Sandy Ln; thence southwesterly on Sandy Ln to Wilde Field Dr; thence southerly on Wilde Field Dr to census block 440030218002000; thence southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440030218002004 — 440030218002000 to Waterview Ave; thence westerly on Waterview Ave to Sefton Ave; thence southerly on Sefton Ave to West Shore Rd; thence easterly on West Shore Rd to Horseneck Rd; thence southeasterly on Horseneck Rd to Gordon Ave; thence westerly on Gordon Ave to Elliot Ave; thence southeasterly on Elliot Ave to Sea View Dr; thence southwesterly on Sea View Dr to census block 440030217003007; thence southwesterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440030217003007 — 440030217004029 to Greenwich Bay; thence southerly, easterly and northerly on the shoreline to the line extending from Symonds Ave; thence southwesterly on Symonds Ave to Bush Ave; thence northwesterly on Bush Ave to West Shore Rd; thence northerly on West Shore Rd to Winter Ave; thence southwesterly on Winter Ave to Green River Ave; thence southeasterly on Green River Ave to Obidiah Ave; thence southwesterly on Obidiah Ave to Church Ave; thence westerly on Church Ave to the point of origin.

Twenty-third district:
The twenty-third representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Warwick bounded by a line beginning at Warwick Ave and Sevilla Ave; thence southwesterly on Sevilla Ave to Julian Rd; thence southerly on Julian Rd to Rodney Rd; thence southwesterly on Rodney Rd to census block 440030214011006; thence southwesterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440030214011006 — 440030214011012 to Buckeye Brook; thence westerly on Buckeye Brook to the eastern boundary line of Rhode Island TF Green International Airport; thence southerly on the eastern boundary line of Rhode Island TF Green International Airport to Warwick Industrial Dr; thence southerly on Warwick Industrial Dr to Main Ave; thence westerly on Main Ave to Amtrak RR; thence southerly on Amtrak RR to Apponaug Cove and census block 440030220002045; thence southeasterly on Apponaug Cove to Greenwich Bay; thence easterly on the shoreline of Greenwich Bay to Brush Neck Cove; thence northerly on Brush Neck Cove to census block 440030217004029; thence northeasterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440030217003007 — 440030217004029 to Sea View Dr; thence northeasterly on Sea View Dr to Elliot Ave; thence northerly on Elliot Ave to Gordon Ave; thence easterly on Gordon Ave to Horseneck Rd; thence northwesterly on Horseneck Rd to West Shore Rd; thence westerly on West Shore Rd to Sefton Ave; thence northerly on Sefton Ave to Waterview Ave; thence easterly on Waterview Ave to census block 440030218002000; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440030218002004 — 440030218002000 to Wilde Field Dr; thence northerly on Wilde Field Dr to Sandy Ln; thence northeasterly on Sandy Ln to Warwick Ave; thence northerly on Warwick Ave to the point of origin.

Twenty-fourth district:
The twenty-fourth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Warwick bounded by a line beginning at I-95 and Centerville Rd; thence westerly on Centerville Rd to the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line; thence southerly on the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line to the Warwick — East Greenwich boundary line; thence easterly on the Warwick — East Greenwich boundary to Greenwich Bay; thence northerly on Greenwich Bay to the point extending from Masthead Dr; thence westerly on Masthead Dr to Post Rd; thence northerly on Post Rd to Greenwich Ave; thence northwesterly on Greenwich Ave to census block 440030221003016; thence southwesterly on the northern boundary line of census block 440030221003024 to I-95; thence southerly on I-95 to the point of origin.

The twenty-fourth representative district shall also consist of all that part of the city of Warwick known as Potowomut or Potowomut Neck.

The twenty-fourth representative district shall also consist of all that part of the town of East Greenwich bounded by a line beginning at South Pierce Rd and Post Rd; thence northwesterly on South Pierce Rd to Westwood Dr; thence northeasterly on Westwood Dr to Lebaron Dr; thence northwesterly on Lebaron Dr to Middle Rd; thence northeasterly on Middle Rd to Kenyon Ave; thence northerly on Kenyon Ave to census block 440030209013022; thence southeasterly and northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440030209013022 — 440030209013023, 440030209013022 — 440030209013027 and 440030209013022 — 440030209013028 to First Ave; thence southeasterly on First Ave to Main St; thence southerly on Main St to Post Rd; thence southerly on Post Rd to Old Forge Rd; thence easterly on Old Forge Rd to the Warwick — East Greenwich boundary line; thence southerly and westerly on the Warwick — East Greenwich boundary line to Post Rd; thence northerly on Post Rd to the point of origin.

Twenty-fifth district:
The twenty-fifth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of West Warwick bounded by a line beginning at the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line and Hillside Ave; thence easterly on Hillside Ave to Fairview Ave; thence northeasterly on Fairview Ave to the Pawtuxet River; thence easterly on the Pawtuxet River to the Pawtuxet River South Branch; thence southerly on the Pawtuxet River South Branch to census block 440030202001033; thence southeasterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440030202001033 — 440030202001027, 440030202001033 — 440030202001024 and 440030202001033 — 440030202001020 to the West Warwick — Warwick boundary line; thence southerly and easterly on the West Warwick — Warwick boundary line to Revere Ave; thence southerly on Revere Ave to Buckley Ave; thence westerly on Buckley Ave to Dawes St; thence westerly on Dawes St to Church St; thence northerly on Church St to Nestor St; thence westerly on Nestor St to New London Turnpike; thence southerly on New London Turnpike to Pulaski St; thence westerly and northerly on Pulaski St to Windsor Park Dr; thence westerly on Windsor Park Dr to the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line; thence northerly on the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

The twenty-fifth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Coventry bounded by a line beginning at the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line and Hillside Ave; thence westerly on Hillside Ave to Brown St; thence northerly on Brown St to Hill St; thence westerly on Hill St to Blackrock Rd; thence southerly on Blackrock Rd to Fairview Ave; thence southerly on Fairview Ave to the Pawtuxet River South Branch; thence southeasterly on the Pawtuxet River South Branch to the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line; thence northerly on the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

Twenty-sixth district:
The twenty-sixth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Coventry bounded by a line beginning at the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line and Hillside Ave; thence westerly on Hillside Ave to Brown St; thence northerly on Brown St to Hill St; thence westerly on Hill St to Blackrock Rd; thence southerly on Blackrock Rd to Gervais St; thence westerly on Gervais St to Knotty Oak Rd; thence northerly on Knotty Oak Rd to Hunters Crossing Dr; thence westerly on Hunters Crossing Dr to Colvintown Rd; thence northerly on Colvintown Rd to the Scituate — Coventry boundary line; thence easterly on the Scituate — Coventry boundary line to the Cranston — Coventry boundary line; thence easterly on the Cranston — Coventry boundary line to the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line; thence southerly on the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

The twenty-sixth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of West Warwick bounded by a line beginning at the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line and Hillside Ave; thence easterly on Hillside Ave to Fairview Ave; thence northeasterly on Fairview Ave to the Pawtuxet River; thence easterly on Pawtuxet River to the Pawtuxet River South Branch; thence southerly on the Pawtuxet River South Branch to census block 440030202001033; thence southeasterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440030202001033 — 440030202001027, 440030202001033 — 440030202001024 and 440030202001033 — 440030202001020 to the West Warwick — Warwick boundary line; thence northeasterly on the West Warwick — Warwick boundary line to the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line; thence westerly on the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line to the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line; thence southerly on the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

The twenty-sixth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Warwick bounded by a line beginning at the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line and Centerville Rd; thence easterly on Centerville Rd to Bald Hill Rd; thence northerly on Bald Hill Rd to Tollgate Rd; thence westerly on Tollgate Rd to the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line; thence northerly on the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line to the Washington Secondary Trail; thence northerly on Washington Secondary Trail to East Ave; thence northwesterly on East Ave to the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line; thence southwesterly on the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

Twenty-seventh district:
The twenty-seventh representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Coventry bounded by a line beginning at the Coventry — East Greenwich boundary line and Arnold Rd; thence easterly on Coventry — East Greenwich boundary line to the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line; thence northerly on the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line to the Pawtuxet River South Branch; thence northwesterly on the Pawtuxet River South Branch to Washington Secondary Trail; thence westerly on Washington Secondary Trail to Laurel Ave; thence southerly on Laurel Ave to Pilgrim Ave; thence southerly on Pilgrim Ave to Tiogue Ave; thence westerly on Tiogue Ave to Arnold Rd; thence southeasterly on Arnold Rd to the point of origin.

The twenty-seventh representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of West Warwick bounded by a line beginning at the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line and Revere Ave; thence southerly on Revere Ave to Buckley Ave; thence westerly on Buckley Ave to Dawes St; thence westerly on Dawes St to Church St; thence northerly on Church St to Nestor St; thence westerly on Nestor St to Main St; thence southerly on Main St to Pulaski St; thence westerly on Pulaski St to Windsor Park Dr; thence westerly on Windsor Park Dr to the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line; thence southerly on the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line to the West Warwick — East Greenwich boundary line; thence easterly on the West Warwick — East Greenwich boundary line to the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line; thence northerly and westerly on the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

Twenty-eighth district:
The twenty-eighth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Coventry bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line and Victory Hwy; thence easterly on the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line to Big River; thence northerly on the Big River and Flat River Reservoir to the line extending from Kingfisher Dr; thence northerly on Kingfisher Dr to Osprey Dr; thence northeasterly on Osprey Dr to Island Dr; thence northerly on Island Dr to Club House Rd; thence easterly on Club House Rd to Eastgate Dr; thence northerly on Eastgate Dr to Doric Ct; thence northerly and easterly on Doric Ct to Reservoir Rd; thence southeasterly on Reservoir Rd to Tiogue Ave; thence easterly on Tiogue Ave to Mishnock River; thence northeasterly on Mishnock River to Pawtuxet River South Branch; thence easterly on Pawtuxet River South Branch to Sandy Bottom Rd; thence northerly on Sandy Bottom Rd to Washington St; thence easterly on Washington St to Washington Secondary Trail; thence easterly on Washington Secondary Trail to the Pawtuxet River; thence northwesterly on the Pawtuxet River to Fairview Ave; thence northerly on Fairview Ave to Blackrock Rd; thence northerly on Blackrock Rd to Gervais St; thence westerly on Gervais St to Knotty Oak Rd; thence northerly on Knotty Oak Rd to Hunters Crossing Dr; thence westerly on Hunters Crossing Dr to Colvintown Rd; thence northerly on Colvintown Rd to the Scituate — Coventry boundary line; thence westerly on the Scituate — Coventry boundary line to the Foster — Coventry boundary line; thence westerly on the Foster — Coventry boundary line to Victory Hwy; thence southerly on Victory Hwy to the point of origin.

Twenty-ninth district:
The twenty-ninth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Coventry bounded by a line beginning at the Coventry — East Greenwich boundary line and Arnold Rd; thence westerly on the Coventry — East Greenwich boundary line to the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line; thence westerly on the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line to Big River; thence northerly on the Big River and Flat River Reservoir to the line extending from Kingfisher Dr; thence northerly on Kingfisher Dr to Osprey Dr; thence northeasterly on Osprey Dr to Island Dr; thence northerly on Island Dr to Club House Rd; thence easterly on Club House Rd to Eastgate Dr; thence northerly on Eastgate Dr to Doric Ct; thence northerly and easterly on Doric Ct to Reservoir Rd; thence southeasterly on Reservoir Rd to Tiogue Ave; thence easterly on Tiogue Ave to Mishnock River; thence northeasterly on Mishnock River to the Pawtuxet River South Branch; thence easterly on Pawtuxet River South Branch to Sandy Bottom Rd; thence northerly on Sandy Bottom Rd to Washington St; thence easterly on Washington St to Washington Secondary Trail; thence easterly on Washington Secondary Trail to Laurel Ave; thence southerly on Laurel Ave to Pilgrim Ave; thence southwesterly on Pilgrim Ave to Tiogue Ave; thence westerly on Tiogue Ave to Arnold Rd; thence southeasterly on Arnold Rd to the point of origin.

The twenty-ninth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of West Greenwich bounded by a line beginning at the West Greenwich — East Greenwich boundary line and I-95; thence southwesterly on I-95 to the West Greenwich — Exeter boundary line; thence westerly on the West Greenwich — Exeter boundary line to the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line; thence northerly on the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line to the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line; thence easterly on the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line to the West Greenwich — East Greenwich boundary line; thence southerly on the West Greenwich — East Greenwich boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirtieth district:
The thirtieth representative district shall consist of all that part of the town of East Greenwich bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of South Pierce Rd and Post Rd; thence northwesterly on South Pierce Rd to Westwood Dr; thence northeasterly on Westwood Dr to Lebaron Dr; thence northwesterly on Lebaron Dr to Middle Rd; thence northeasterly on Middle Rd to Kenyon Ave; thence northerly on Kenyon Ave to census block 440030209013022; thence southeasterly and northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440030209013022 — 440030209013023, 440030209013022 — 440030209013027 and 440030209013022 — 440030209013028 to First Ave; thence southeasterly on First Ave to Main St; thence southerly on Main St to Post Rd; thence southerly on Post Rd to Old Forge Rd; thence easterly on Old Forge Rd to the Warwick — East Greenwich boundary line; thence northerly and easterly on the Warwick — East Greenwich boundary line to the West Warwick — East Greenwich boundary line; thence westerly on the West Warwick — East Greenwich boundary line to the Coventry — East Greenwich boundary line; thence westerly on the Coventry — East Greenwich boundary line to the West Greenwich — East Greenwich boundary line; thence southerly on the West Greenwich — East Greenwich boundary line to the East Greenwich — Exeter boundary line; thence easterly on the East Greenwich — Exeter boundary line to the East Greenwich — North Kingstown boundary line; thence easterly and northerly on the east Greenwich — North Kingstown boundary line to Post Rd; thence northerly on Post Rd to the point of origin.

The thirtieth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of West Greenwich bounded by a line beginning at the West Greenwich — East Greenwich boundary line and I-95; thence southwesterly on I-95 to the West Greenwich — Exeter boundary line; thence easterly on the West Greenwich — Exeter boundary line to the West Greenwich — East Greenwich boundary line; thence northerly on the West Greenwich — East Greenwich boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-first district:
The thirty-first district shall consist of all of that part of the town of North Kingstown bounded by a line beginning at the Exeter — North Kingstown boundary line and the Amtrak RR; thence northeasterly on the Amtrak RR to census block 440090503012001; thence easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090503012001 — 440090503012016 to Cocumcussoc Brook; thence northerly, easterly and southeasterly on Cocumcussoc Brook to Post Rd; thence northerly on Post Rd to Seaview RR; thence northeasterly on Seaview RR to Roger Williams Way; thence southeasterly on Roger Williams Way and its extension to Narragansett Bay and the North Kingstown — Jamestown boundary line; thence northerly on the North Kingstown — Jamestown boundary line to the North Kingstown-Portsmouth boundary line; thence northerly on the North Kingstown — Portsmouth boundary line to the Warwick — North Kingstown boundary line; thence southwesterly on the Warwick — North Kingstown boundary line to the East Greenwich — North Kingstown boundary line; thence southwesterly and westerly on the East Greenwich — North Kingstown boundary line to the Exeter — North Kingstown boundary line; thence southerly on the Exeter — North Kingstown boundary line to the point of origin.

The thirty-first district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Exeter bounded by a line beginning at the Exeter — South Kingstown boundary line and South County Trail; thence northerly on South County Trail to South Rd; thence northerly on South Rd to census block 440090505003086; thence southeasterly on the northern boundary lines of census blocks 440090505003092 and 440090505003091 to the Exeter — North Kingstown boundary line; thence southerly on the Exeter — North Kingstown boundary line to the Exeter — South Kingstown boundary line; thence westerly on the Exeter — South Kingstown boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-second district:
The thirty-second district shall consist of all of that part of the town of North Kingstown bounded by a line beginning at the Exeter — North Kingstown boundary line and the Amtrak RR; thence northeasterly on the Amtrak RR to census block 440090503012001; thence easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090503012001 — 440090503012016 to Cocumcussoc Brook; thence northerly, easterly and southeasterly on Cocumcussoc Brook to Post Rd; thence northerly on Post Rd to Seaview RR; thence northeasterly on Seaview RR to Roger Williams Way; thence southeasterly on Roger Williams Way and its extension to Narragansett Bay and the North Kingstown — Jamestown boundary line; thence southerly on the North Kingstown — Jamestown boundary line to the North Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line; thence westerly on the North Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line to the North Kingstown — South Kingstown boundary line; thence westerly on the North Kingstown — South Kingstown boundary line to the Exeter — North Kingstown boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Exeter — North Kingstown boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-third district:
The thirty-third representative district shall consist of that part of the town of Narragansett bounded by a line beginning at the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line and Mumford Rd; thence southeasterly on Mumford Rd to Kingstown Rd; thence easterly on Kingstown Rd to Strathmore Rd; thence northerly on Strathmore Rd to census block 440090515031005; thence westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090515031005 — 440090515031044 to Little Neck Pond; thence northerly on Little Neck Pond to Anne Hoxie Ln; thence easterly on Anne Hoxie Ln to Boston Neck Rd; thence southerly on Boston Neck Rd to Narragansett Ave; thence easterly on the extension of Narragansett Ave to the Atlantic Ocean and the Narragansett boundary line; thence northerly on the Narragansett boundary line to the North Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line; thence westerly on the North Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line to the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line; thence southwesterly on the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line to the point of origin.

The thirty-third representative district shall also consist of that part of the town of South Kingstown bounded by a line beginning at the Exeter — South Kingstown boundary line and Old North Rd; thence southerly on Old North Rd to Kingstown Rd; thence westerly on Kingstown Rd to South Rd; thence southerly on South Rd to the William C. O’Neill Bike Path; thence easterly on the William C. O’Neill Bike Path to Curtis Corner Rd; thence northeasterly on Curtis Corner Rd to Saugatucket Rd; thence easterly on Saugatucket Rd to North Rd; thence southerly on North Rd to Kingstown Rd; thence southeasterly on Kingstown Rd to the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line; thence easterly and northerly on the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-fourth district:
The thirty-fourth representative district shall consist of that part of the town of South Kingstown bounded by a line beginning at Curtis Corner Rd and William C. O’Neill Bike Path; thence northeasterly on Curtis Corner Rd to Saugatucket Rd; thence easterly on Saugatucket Rd to North Rd; thence southerly on North Rd to Kingstown Rd; thence southeasterly on Kingstown Rd to the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line; thence southerly on the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line to the line extending from Smelt Brook; thence northwesterly on Smelt Brook to Browns Brook; thence northerly on Browns Brook to Commodore Perry Highway; thence easterly on Commodore Perry Highway to Post Rd; thence northerly on Post Rd to South Rd; thence northwesterly on South Rd to Allen Ave; thence easterly on Allen Ave to Rodman St; thence northerly on Rodman St to the William C. O’Neill Bike Path; thence westerly on William C. O’Neill Bike Path to census block 440090512012016; thence westerly between the boundary lines of census blocks 440090512012016 — 440090512012015 and 440090512012005 — 440090512012014 to census block 440090512012005; thence northwesterly on the eastern boundary line of census block 440090512012005 to Curtis Corner Rd; thence northeasterly on Curtis Corner Rd to the point of origin.

The thirty-fourth representative district shall consist of that part of the town of South Kingstown known as Gardner Island, Plato Island and Beef Island.

The thirty-fourth representative district shall also consist of that part of the town of Narragansett bounded by a line beginning at the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line and Mumford Rd; thence southeasterly on Mumford Rd to Kingstown Rd; thence easterly on Kingstown Rd to Strathmore Rd; thence northerly on Strathmore Rd to census block 440090515031005; thence westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090515031005 — 440090515031044 to Little Neck Pond; thence northerly on Little Neck Pond to Anne Hoxie Ln; thence easterly on Anne Hoxie Ln to Boston Neck Rd; thence southerly on Boston Neck Rd to Narragansett Ave; thence easterly on the extension of Narragansett Ave to the Atlantic Ocean and the Narragansett boundary line; thence southerly and westerly on the Narragansett boundary line to the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line; thence northerly on the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-fifth district:
The thirty-fifth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of South Kingstown bounded by a line beginning at the Exeter — Richmond — South Kingstown boundary point; thence southerly on the Richmond — South Kingstown boundary line to the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line; thence southerly on the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line to census block 440090513041031; thence northeasterly and easterly, on the northern boundary line of census block 440090513041031 to census block 440090513041037; thence easterly and southerly on the northern and eastern boundary line of census block 440090513041037 to Sand Plains Trl; thence easterly on Sand Plains Trl to Red House Rd; thence northeasterly on Red House Rd to Ministerial Rd; thence northerly on Ministerial Rd to Alewife Brook; thence easterly on Alewife Brook to Tucker Pond continuing on the southern boundary of census block 440090513041018 to census block 440090513041017; thence southeasterly on the southern boundary line of census block 440090513041017 to US Highway 1; thence southwesterly on US Highway 1 to Matunuck Beach Rd; thence southerly on Matunuck Beach Rd to Sycamore Ln; thence easterly on Sycamore Ln to census block 440090513021017; thence easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090513021003 — 440090513021017 to Potters Pond; thence southerly on Potters Pond to census block 440090513021041; thence southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090513021041 — 440090513021044 to the Atlantic Ocean; thence easterly on the shoreline to South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line; thence northeasterly on the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line to the line extending from Smelt Brook; thence northwesterly on Smelt Brook to Browns Brook; thence northerly on Browns Brook to Commodore Perry Highway; thence easterly on Commodore Perry Highway to Post Rd; thence northerly on Post Rd to South Rd; thence northwesterly on South Rd to Allen Ave; thence easterly on Allen Ave to Rodman St; thence northerly on Rodman St to the William C. O’Neill Bike Path; thence westerly on William C. O’Neill Bike Path to census block 440090512012016; thence westerly between the boundary line of census blocks 440090512012016 — 440090512012015 and 440090512012005 — 440090512012014 to census block 440090512012005; thence northwesterly on the eastern boundary line of census block 440090512012005 to Curtis Corner Rd; thence northeasterly on Curtis Corner Rd to the William C. O’Neill Bike Path; thence westerly on the William C. O’Neill Bike Path to South Rd; thence northerly on South Rd to Kingstown Rd; thence easterly on Kingstown Rd to Old North Rd; thence northerly on Old North Rd to the Exeter — South Kingstown boundary line; thence westerly on the Exeter — South Kingstown boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-sixth district:
The thirty-sixth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Westerly bounded by a line beginning at the Westerly — Charlestown boundary line and Post Rd; thence westerly on Post Rd to Dunns Corner Rd; thence northerly on Dunns Corner Rd to census block 440090509012064; thence westerly and southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090509012064 — 440090509012063 to census block 40090509012057; thence southerly, westerly, and northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090509012057 — 440090509012025, 440090509012057 — 440090509012027, 440090509012057 — 440090509012061 and 440090509012057 — 440090509012062 to Dunns Corner Rd; thence northerly on Dunns Corner Rd to Pound Rd; thence westerly and northerly on Pound Rd to census block 440090509012009; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090509012009 — 440090509012008 to Chapman Pond; thence northerly on the eastern shoreline of Chapman Pond through Aguntaug Brook to the Amtrak RR; thence northeasterly on the Amtrak RR to S Main St; thence southerly on S Main St to Bradford Rd; thence southwesterly on Bradford Rd to Woody Hill Rd; thence southeasterly on Woody Hill Rd to Woody Hill Rd Extension; thence southerly on Woody Hill Rd Extension to census block 440090509022007; thence easterly on the northern boundary line of census block 440090509022007 to Church St; thence southerly on Church St to the Westerly — Charlestown boundary line; thence southerly on the Westerly — Charlestown boundary line to the point of origin.

The thirty-sixth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of South Kingstown bounded by a line beginning at the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line and Shannock Rd; thence northerly on the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line to census block 440090513041026; thence northeasterly and easterly on the northern boundary line of census block 440090513041031 to census block 440090513041037; thence easterly and southerly on the northern and eastern boundary line of census block 440090513041037 to Sand Plains Trl; thence easterly on Sand Plains Trl to Red House Rd; thence northeasterly on Red House Rd to Ministerial Rd; thence northerly on Ministerial Rd to Alewife Brook; thence easterly on Alewife Brook to Tucker Pond continuing on the southern boundary of census block 440090513041018 to census block 440090513041017; thence southeasterly on the southern boundary line of census block 440090513041017 to US Highway 1; thence southwesterly on US Highway 1 to Matunuck Beach Rd; thence southerly on Matunuck Beach Rd to Sycamore Ln; thence easterly on Sycamore Ln to census block 440090513021017; thence easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090513021003 — 440090513021017 to Potters Pond; thence southerly on Potters Pond to census block 440090513021041; thence southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090513021041 — 440090513021044 to the Atlantic Ocean; thence southwesterly on the shoreline to the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line; thence northerly on the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line to the point of origin.

The thirty-sixth district shall also consist of all of the town Charlestown.

The thirty-sixth district shall also consist of all of the town of New Shoreham.

Thirty-seventh district:
The thirty-seventh representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Westerly bounded by a line beginning at the Westerly — Charlestown boundary line and Post Rd; thence westerly on Post Rd to Dunns Corner Rd; thence northerly on Dunns Corner Rd to census block 440090509012064; thence westerly and southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090509012064 — 440090509012063 to census block 44090509012057; thence southerly, westerly, and northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090509012057 — 440090509012025, 440090509012057 — 440090509012027, 440090509012057 — 440090509012061 and 440090509012057 — 440090509012062 to Dunns Corner Rd; thence northerly on Dunns Corner Rd to Pound Rd; thence westerly and northerly on Pound Rd to census block 440090509012009; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440090509012009 — 440090509012008 to Chapman Pond; thence northerly on the eastern shoreline of Chapman Pond through Aguntaug Brook to the Amtrak RR; thence westerly on the Amtrak RR to the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line; thence southerly and westerly on the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line to the Atlantic Ocean; thence easterly on the Westerly boundary line to the Westerly — Charlestown boundary line; thence northerly on the Westerly — Charlestown boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-eighth district:
The thirty-eighth representative district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Westerly bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line and the Amtrak RR; thence easterly and northerly on the Amtrak RR to S Main St; thence southerly on S Main St to Bradford Rd; thence southwesterly on Bradford Rd to Woody Hill Rd; thence southeasterly on Woody Hill Rd to Woody Hill Rd Extension; thence southerly on Woody Hill Rd Extension to census block 440090509022007; thence easterly on the northern boundary line of census block 440090509022007 to Church St; thence southerly on Church St to the Westerly — Charlestown boundary line; thence northerly on the Westerly — Charlestown boundary line to the Hopkinton — Westerly boundary line; thence westerly and northerly on the Hopkinton — Westerly boundary line to the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line; thence westerly and southerly on the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line to the point of origin.

The thirty-eighth representative district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Hopkinton bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line and Camp Yawgoog Rd; thence easterly, southerly and northeasterly on Camp Yawgoog Rd to Spring St; thence southerly on Spring St to Wincheck Pond Rd; thence southerly and easterly on Wincheck Pond Rd to Spring St; thence easterly on Spring St to Sawmill Rd; thence northerly on Sawmill Rd to Dye Hill Rd; thence easterly on Dye Hill Rd to Fairview Ave; thence southeasterly on Fairview Ave to Bank St; thence southwesterly on Bank St to Main St; thence southwesterly on Main St to Brushy Brook; thence southerly on Brushy Brook to the Hopkinton — Richmond boundary line; thence southerly on the Hopkinton — Richmond boundary line to the Hopkinton — Charlestown boundary line; thence southerly on the Hopkinton — Charlestown boundary line to the Hopkinton — Westerly boundary line; thence westerly and northerly on the Hopkinton — Westerly boundary line to the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line; thence northerly on the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-ninth district:
The thirty-ninth district shall consist of all of the town of Richmond.
